tex/patterns/utf8/hyph-hu.tex
% Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns v20031107
%
% Copyright (C) 2003, NAGY Bence <huhyphn@tipogral.hu>
% This file can be distributed under the terms of the
% GNU General Public License version 2.
%
% \message{Huhyphn - hungarian hyphenation patterns v20031107}
%
\patterns{%
.a2
.adás1s
.ae1
.agyon1
.al1eg
.al1e2m
.al1e2s
.al1ér
.al1is
.al1os
.arc1c
.ar2c3ho
.atmo1
.az1a2
.az1ám
.aze2
.á2
.ál1a2
.ál1e
.ál1é2
.ál1i
.ál1ok
.áre2
.ár1em
.ár2nyo
.áro2
.ár1os
.ár1s2
.át1ad.
.át1ada
.át1á2
.át1e2
.át1é2
.át1i2
.áto2
.át1ol
.át1or
.át1os
.át1ö2
.b2
.ba2l1e2g
.ba1ts
.bá1th
.be2csé
.bei2
.be1k2
.bi2o
.bo2rit
.bu2szá
.c2
.cle2
.cs2
.csőda2rab.
.d2
.da2i
.di1kr
.e2
.eb1u2
.egy1a
.egy1ü2l
.el1a2d
.el1a2k
.el1an
.ela2s
.el1ass
.el1aszo
.elá2
.el1ál
.el1ás
.el1áz
.el1e2gyek
.el1ejt
.el1emel
.el1eng
.el1e2p
.el1e2r
.el1e2se
.el1e2sés
.el1e2si
.el1esn
.el1ess
.el1est
.el1esv
.el1esz
.el1ékt
.el1éle
.elé2n
.el1éne
.el1ér.
.el1é2re
.el1ért
.el1érv
.el1id
.el1in
.el1ir
.eli2s
.el1iss
.el1isz
.el1itta
.el1ít
.elo2k
.el1oká
.el1os
.elö2
.el1öli
.el1ölő
.el1ölt.
.elői2
.el1t2
.el1u2
.elü2
.el1ül.
.el1üli
.el1ült
.el1ülv
.es1er
.et2h
.ex1el
.ez1e2l
.é2
.égés1s
.ég1o
.ék1a2
.ék1i
.én1á
.én1el
.épe2
.ép1es
.ér2csi
.ér1el
.ét1é
.f2
.fa2jeg
.fe2len
.fe2lev
.fe2lék
.fe2lül.
.fé2lér
.fé2lév
.fé2má
.fö2lül.
.g2
.ga2z1em
.gé2ná
.gi1g2
.h2
.ha2d1e2
.hale2
.ha2lev
.ha2l1és
.há2li
.háncs1
.há2tus
.he2i
.horo1s
.i2
.in2d3z
.io2ná
.í2
.íráskész1
.j2
.jazz1
.je2gy1á
.k2
.ka2ring
.kés1s
.ké2t1a2
.ké2tá
.kiá2
.kié2
.ki1g2
.kr2
.l2
.la2pa
.le2g1
.le3g2esle2g1
.le3g2esle3g2esle2g1
.legé2nyem
.le3gy
.le2ná
.le1t2r
.lé2ta
.li2o1
.liszt1á
.lókész1
.ló1s2
.lőe2
.ly1o
.m2
.malo2
.má2r1is
.me2g1á
.me2g1e2s
.me2g1é2
.me2gis
.me2gő
.me2i
.mé2szi
.mu2e
.n2
.na2gya
.na2gyá
.na2p1e
.na1t
.nerc1
.ne2um
.né2pí
.ny2l
.o2
.ok1a2d
.ok1ir
.ó2
.óé2
.óf2
.ö2
.ön1á
.ön1k2
.ön3n
.össz1á
.öte2
.öt1el
.özö2n1ö
.ő2
.őr1an
.ős1a2
.ős1e2r
.ős1í2
.őz3s
.p2
.pa2i
.pais1
.pe2r1a2
.pé2k1
.ph2
.pier2
.po2re
.q2
.r2
.ra2big
.rát2
.re2ár
.ren2d1ő2
.ru2ma
.s2
.sa2li
.sc2
.sk2
.so2ki
.so1ny
.so2rál
.sp2
.st2
.sto2
.su2r
.sz2
.sza2kér
.sze2szá
.szé2t
.szk2
.szódás1
.szt2
.t2
.ta2ni
.ta2nos
.ta2ur
.tá2v1i2ratozá
.te2j1á
.té2nyi
.té2rá
.to2ké
.tö2k1élv
.tölcséres1
.tűz3s
.u2
.utas1s
.ú2
.úr1a
.úr1ist
.út1a2
.út1e
.ü2
.ük1
.ű2
.űr1i
.v2
.va2d1al
.va2gyi
.vasas1s
.va2sol
.vé2g1o
.w2
.x2
.y2
.z2
.ze2i
.zs2
2a.
2a1a
aa2d
aa2j
aa2k
aa2l
a2am
aa2n
aa2p
aa2u
aa2v
aa2z
2a1á
aá2b
aá2gak
aá2gy
a2ál.
a2áln
aá2p
aá2r
aá2s
aá2t1
aáta2
aba2de
2aban
2abar
2abáj
2abáz
2abes
2abir
2abiz
2abom
abos3s
2abő
2abú
a2b1ü
a2ce.
ace2l
ac1ele
acé2l1e
a2c1ép
ac1ére
a2chá
ac3hoz
2ací
ac3ság
a2c3sü
ac3sz
ada2le
ada2li
ada2l1ú
a2dap
ad1apr
ada2t1e2
ad1ág
a2dású
ad2del
a2d1e2g
ade2i
1a2dek
ad1e2le
ad1elő
ad1elv
ade2n
ad1ene
ade2s
ad1esé
adet2
ad1e2v
adé2ke
a2d1ép
a2d1é2v
ad1ide
adi2o1g2
ad1íz
a2d1orzá
1a2dód
ad1ö2l
ad2rót
adu2r
ad1ura
2adú
2a1e
ae2b
ae2c
ae2dé
aegész1
a2ei
ae2k
ae2l1a2
ae2le
ae2l1o
ae2lő
ae2me
ae2p
ae2re
aero1s
aerosz2
ae2rő
ae2se
ae2sé
ae2si
ae2ső
ae2v
ae2z
2a1é
aé2g
aé2h
aé2k
aé2l
aé2n
aé2p
aé2r
aé2v
2afajn
2afe
afe2li
2afés
2afi
2afő
af2re
2afü
a2g1a2j
ag1any
ag1arc
agán1n
agá2nyé
a2gár.
ag1át1a
ag1edé
a2g1eg
ag1elm
ag1elt
ag1elv
a2gem
ag1emb
a2g1ev
a2g1é2g
a2g1é2l
ag1épí
1agg.
ag3gye
a1g2hó
agi2g
ag1igé
a2g1i2p
a2g1ír
agli2
ago2na
2agor
a2g1ors
ag1órá
a2g1öt
a1g2raf
a2gut
ag1uta
ag1u2tá
a2g1út
a2g1ü2
a2gyad
agy1a2dó
a2gyag
agy1agy
agy1ala
agy1alk
agy1any
a2gyál
agy1ári
a2gyát
agy1el
a2gy1em
a2gy1en
a2gyep
agy1erő
a2gy1es
a2gy1ez
a2gyér
agy1ére
a2gyét
a2gyic
a2gyim
a2gy1ip
a2gyir
agy1is.
agy1ist
a2gyoko
a2gyokt
agyo2r
agy1oro
2ahar
2ahe
1ahh
2ahi
2ahí
aho2l1i
2ahu
a1i
a2ia.
ai2bo
2ai2de
ai2dő
ai2e
2aig2
ai2gazító
ai2gé
a2ign
ai2j
ai2k1as
ai2k1e2
ai2ma.
2ai2má
ai2nal
ai2nas
2aing
2aint
ai2o
2ai2p
ai2ram
ai2rá
ai2rod
ai2zo
2a1í2
a2j1al
aja2n
aj1ana
2aje
a2j1e2d
aj1egé
a2j1elm
aj1e2lő
a2j1em
a2j1er
a2jég
a2j1ék
a2j1ir
1ajkúa
a2j1ola
aj1old
aj1ül
aj2ze
aj2zí
aj2zsí
a2k1akn
a2k1alk
ak1ann
2akap
aka2s1ü
2akav
akás1s
2ake
a2k1eg
ak1els
ak1emb
a2k1e2rő
aké2k
a2k1éke
2akép
ak1épí
2akérd
a2k1é2ret
ak1értel
a2k1értő
2akés
a1khó
akiá2
2akin
a2k1i2p
ak1iro
ak1is.
aki2s1a
ak1isk
ak1ism
ak1izm
2akí
ak2kór
ak2lei
ak2lés
ak2lin
a2k1o2ly
a2k1orv
2akö
a2k1örv
ak1őr.
2akré
2akri
ak2rit
a1k2ru
ak1ug
2akut
2akú
ak1útr
2akü
ak1ülé
a2k1ü2v
2akv
al1abl
alag1g
ala2gol
ala2j1e2
1alakí
1a2lakok
1a2lakú
a2lany
ala2nye
ala2p1a2
ala2pár
1a2lapi
1a2lapí
alap1p
a2láf
al1ág.
al1á2ga
al1ágg
al1á2gi
al1ágk
al1á2go
1aláí
2alán
a2láp
a2le.
al1eln
al1elt
al1eml
al1eny
al1e2rő
al1esp
a2l1est
ale2sz
al1ez
a2léb
a2l1é2ne
al1érz
a2l1é2te
1alfö
alg2
al1gr
al1ido
a2l1ikr
alió2ra
a2l1irá
al1isk
al1isp
al1itt
al1í2rá
1aljb
1alji
1aljn
1aljz
al2l1aj
1almád
1almák
almás1s
2alogizm
aloi2do
2alok
al1ola
alo2mit
alo2m1o2k
2alor
alos1s
a2l1oszt
2alógiá
2alógu
alókész1
a2l1ön
a2l1ös
al2t1el
al1úr.
al1úri
al1útr
a2l1ü2
1alvó
a2lyál
a2ly1e
am1a2dó
2amag
am1akk
am1app
a2m1arc
am1arr
ama2ter
ama2tin
2amá
a2m1árj
am2b1eg
am2b1ő
a2me.
ame2g1á
a2m1elá
a2m1e2l1o
am1els
am1elt
a2m1erd
1a2meri
a2m1e2rő
a2m1érd
am1fr
a2mim
a2m1i2rá
amise2
amis3s
am1ír
2amod
amos3s
a2m1ó2r
a2m1ö2
a2mő
am1őr
am1ős
am1p2h
2amun
2amut
a2m1ü2
2amű
a2nah
an1akk
an1alj
an1any
ana2sze
a2n1az
anás1s
an2ce.
ancs1es
an2cső
an2dolv
an1eb
a2ner
a2nes
anet1o
ane2u
a2n1e2z
2ané
ané2v
an1évb
an1éve
an1évn
an2gad
an2g1em
an2gí
an2g1or
an2g1osz
an2g1ös
1anim
an2k1a2k
ank1ala
an2kau
an2k1el
an2k1ék.
ank1osz
an2k1u2
an2kü
ano1g2
an1old
an1onn
an1ott
an1órá
2anö
an1ö2t
ansz1ál
an2sz1u2
an2tau
a2nü
any1ala
1a2nyád
a2nyám.
a2ny1á2rak
2anye
a2ny1ed
a2ny1em
any1eső
anyé2
any1éh
any1ék
any1ér
a2nyif
a2nyig
anyigaz1
a2nyim
2anyo
a2nyor
a2ny1osz
any1ó2r
a2nyö
a2nyő
anzo2
2a1o
ao2la
a2olo
ao2ro
2a1ó
a2ób
a2óc
a2óf
aó2l
aó2ra
aó2rá
aó2ri
2a1ö2
2a1ő2
apa2cs1i
ap1a2da
1a2pai
1a2paké
ap1a2la
ap1alk
apa2tér
1a2pád
1a2páé
a2p1ág
1a2pái
a2páll
a2p1áru
a2páta
2ape
a2p1e2g
ape2i
ape2l
ap1ele
ap1elg
ap1elj
ap1elő
ap1elv
a2p1em
ape2n
ap1ene
ap1eny
ape2s
ap1ese
ap1f2
a2p1ide
api2g
ap1ige
a2p1i2rá
a2p1ist
a2p1ín
2apl
a2p1ola
ap1ope
apos3s
ap1ös
ap1öt
ap2rém
a1p2rés
1aprí
ap1szt
ap1t2
ap1udv
ap1utá
ar1ajt
ara2nye
ar1ará
a2r1ág.
a2r1á2ga
ará2gáb
ará2gán
ará2gár
ará2gát
ará2gáv
a2r1ágb
a2r1ágg
a2r1ági
a2r1á2go
a2r1ágr
a2r1ágt
ar1á2guk
ar1á2gun
ar1á2gy
a2r1áll
ará2nyé
ar2car
ar2ced
ar2ces
ar2cö
arc3sor
1arcú
ar2dél
2are
ar1e2dz
are2l
ar1elh
ar1elo
a2r1e2m
aren2d1ő
a2r1er
a2r1e2v
ar1é2ne
a2r1é2r
aré2z1
ar1gh
argon1n
a2r1i2d
a2r1iga
ar1ingb
a2r1inge
a2rizma.
a2rizmán
a2rizo
ar1khe
ar2k1ő2
ar2k1u2s
2aro
arog2r
aro2mis
a2r1or
2aró
a2r1ó2rá
a2r1ö2l
a2r1ő2
ar1s2h
ar1thá
arto1g2rá
art1old
ar2t1ő2r
ar1ty
2aru
a2r1ü
a2r1ű2
ar2v1ér
a1ry
a2s1a2g
2asaj
as1a2kar
2asal
a2s1alk
as1alm
asa2n
a2s1ant
a2s1any
as1apr
a2s1ál
as1áru
2asáv
2ase
as1e2d
as1e2k
as1ell
as1emb
as1e2s
as1ez
as1éhe
as1ék.
a2s1é2l
as1étv
a2s1é2v
asi2d
as1ide
a2s1i2p
as1isk
as1izo
2asík
as1old
2asor
as1ord
as1osz
as1órá
as1ö2k
as1ön
as1ös
2asp
as1sy
as3szab
astil2
2astí
as1urn
a2s1u2t
a2s1ú2t
2asü
as1ün
a2s1ür
as1üs
a2s1ü2v
2asű
a2sz1ad
asz1ág.
a2szárad
2aszeg
2aszek
asz1e2lő
a2sz1év
a2szid
2aszkó
asz2kóp
asz1ors
asz1ön
asz2t1és
asz2t1ív
2aszü
1aszz
at1abl
2atak
2atan
2atar
ata2rán
a2t1arc
ata2tom
a2t1ág
2atál
atá2nal
2atár
a2t1á2ram
a2t1átl
a2t1átv
atá2v1i2
atá2v1í2
2ate
a2t1ef
at1e2gé
at1e2gye
ate2led
at1e2lem
at1elh
at1elm
at1elv
at1elz
at1emb
at1eml
at1epo
at1e2tet
at1e2ve
a2t1e2z
2até
at1éhe
a2t1é2le
a2t1ép
a2t1érz
at1év.
2at1f2
at2hé
at2hón
atig2
a2t1iga
at1i2gé
a2t1inf
ati2nó
at1iro
a2t1isk
2atn
a2t1ob
ato1g2
ato2me
at1opt
2ator
at1orsz
a2t1orv
atos3s
atosz2
ato1szf
2ató
a2t1ó2rá
ató2riá
ató1sz
2atö
a2t1ös
at1ö2ve
at1ö2vö
at2sán
attó2
at2tór
at1tre
at1tré
2atu
a2t1uj
1atyj
a1tyl
2atz
a1u
au2de
au2ga
aug2h
au2go
au1k2r
au1ly
2aur
a2us.
au2tal
a2utó.
au2zs
a1ú
aú2r1
aú2s
2a1ü2
a1ű2
av1anh
avara2n
ava2s1as
ava2sze
2avá
2avi
avi2cse
avíz1
2ay
a1ya
a1yá
a1ye
2aza
aza2teg
azaú2
az1áll
az1ált
azás1s
az2du
2aze
az1e2le
az1elj
az1elő
aze2o
az1év
az1i2d
azo2n1á
2azó
az1óta
az1p2
az3ság
az3st
a2zsú
a2z3sü
az1ut
az1új
2á.
á1a2
á1á2
áb1áll
áb2b1a2d
áb2b1é2
áb2bis
áb2bol
áb2bos
áb2b1ot
áb2bö
áb2bú
ábe2l1a
ábe2lér
á2b1elő
á2b1e2m
á2b1e2n
á2b1ér
á2b1ikr
á2b1in
á2b1ir
2ábiz
áb1izm
áb1izz
2ábí
1ábrá
2ábu
ábu2t
áb1utá
áca1k2
ác1al
ácá2ná
á2c1e
ác3ho
ácin2ti
áci2ósz
á2cs1aj
á2csas
ác3ság
á2cs1e2l
á2csil
ácsü2
ács1ül
ád1alk
áda2n
ád1any
á2d1apá
á2d1ál
á2d1e2l
á2d1e2m
áde2ros
á2d1es
á2d1in
ád1ira
ádo2ge
á2d1osz
ádö2
á1d2rót
ádsza2
á2d1ur
á1dy
á1e2
á1é
áé2he
áé2ke
áé2l
áé2ne
áé2p
áé2re
áé2ri
áé2rő.
áf1elm
áf1üz
á2g1a2d
ág1ala
á2g1a2r
1á2gaz
á2g1ág
á2g1álv
á2g1áru
á2g1árv
ágá2sé
ág1e2d
á2g1e2g
á2g1e2l
á2g1e2s
á2g1é2g
á2g1é2l
ág1é2ne
á2g1ép
ág1érd
ág1érte
ág1érté
ágg2
ág1gr
á2g1id
á2g1if
á2g1iga
á2gigén
á2g1ill
á2g1ing
á2g1i2p
ág1iro
ág1ír
á2g1ola
á2g1old
á2g1olv
ágos3s
ág1óc
á2g1ö2
ágsz2
á2g1u2r
á2g1u2t
á2g1ü2
á2g1ű2
á2gyac
á2gyál
á2gy1e2
2áha
2áhá
2áhe
áh1ors
á1i
ái2do
ái2g
ái2j
2áil
ái2má
ái2rá
ái2s
á1í2
á2jí
áj2kő
áj2lá
á2j1or
á2jő
áj2teg
áj2tel
áj2ti
á2jul
á2jü
ák1abr
á2k1al
á2k1as
á2k1ál
á2k1e2l
ák1em
á2k1é2l
ák1é2ve
ák1in
ák1k2
á2k1oli
á2k1oll
á2k1ott
2ákö
ák1s
á2k1ut
ál1abl
ála2m
ála2n
á2l1ana
á2l1ang
ál1any
ála2szel
ála2szü
ál1áll
ál1árf
1áldá
1áldj
1áldo
ál1d2r
1áldu
1áldv
ále2l
ál1emu
á2l1e2r
ál1ér.
álé2t
ál1éte
á2l1id
ális3s
á2l1í2
ál1k2
ál2liz
ál1ob
á2l1o2kok
á2l1ol
1á2lomb
álo2me
álo2mit
á2l1op
á2l1or
ál1osz
2álö
ál1öl
ál1ös
ál1öz
ál1p2
áls2
ál1st
ál2t1e2g
ál2tiv
á2l1ug
ál1u2s
ál1u2t
ál1út
á2lü
ál1ű
á2lyal
á2lyál
á2ly1e
á2lyiga
á2lyis
á2ly1ó2
á2lyö
á2lyü
á2m1ac
á2m1akt
á2m1a2l
áma2n
ám1any
ám1apa
ám1a2rá
ám1aty
ám1ár.
ám1bl
áme2g
ám1elm
á2m1e2m
á2m1es
ámész1
ám1f2
á2m1id
ám1il
á2m1ip
á2m1i2r
ámi2s
ám1ism
ám1isz
á2m1ír
ám1ív
á2m1ob
á2m1op
ámo2rál
ám1oszl
á2m1ö
á2m1ő2
ám1p2
ám1s
ámu2n
ám1ur
á2m1ü2
ám1ű2z
ána2d
án1ada
ánai2
án1ajt
á2n1akc
á2n1a2la
án1alk
á2n1a2pa
á2n1apá
án1ass
án1aut
á2n1áll
án1áru
án2c1ed
án2c1es
án2c3h
án2c1is
án2cor
án2c1ö
án2cü
á2n1e2d
án1e2g
ánegyez1
án1e2l
án1em
án1en
án1e2t
á2n1é2g
á2n1é2l
án1é2ne
á2n1épü
án1érő
án1f2
án2g1a2r
án2gel
án2g1e2s
án2g1és
án2g1osz
án2gö
á2n1i2d
á2n1im
án1int
á2n1ip
á2n1ir
án1isz
ánizs1
á2n1izz
án2k1es
án1k2l
á2n1oki
á2n1or
á2n1osz
á2n1ot
ánó2r
á2n1ö
án1szf
án1sz2l
án1szp
án2tir
án2t1iz
án2tór
á2n1uj
á2n1u2t
ánú2
án1út
á2n1ü
ány1a2dó
ány1a2la
ánya2n
ány1any
á2nyap
ány1ass
á2ny1ál
á2ny1ár.
á2ny1á2rak
ánye2
á2nyeg
á2ny1el
ány1er
á2nyég
á2nyél
á2nyérz
ány1í2r
á2ny1ola
á2ny1osz
á2ny1ö
á2nyő
ány1us
á2nyü
án2z1ag
án2zs
á1o
áo2sze
á1ó
á1ö
á1ő2
áp1a2n
ápe2
áp1eg
á2p1ér
áp1int
á2poló
ápora2
ápo2rad
ár1abl
ár1abr
2árag
á2r1agg
ára2j
ár1ajá
ár1ajt
á2r1a2la
ár1alá
ár1alj
ár1alk
ára2m1el
1á2ramk
1á2ramú
ár1a2p
á2r1a2r
á2r1á2g
ár1ár.
á2r1áro
ár1árt
árás3s
ár1á2t1e2
á2r1átk
ár1b2
1árboc
árd1el
ár2d1ó2
á2r1e2g
á2r1e2l
ár1eng
á2r1er
ár1esé
á2r1e2z
á2r1é2g
á2r1éj
á2r1é2n
á2r1ép
á2r1é2tű
ár2gye
ár2gyor
ár1ide
ári2g
á2r1iga
ár1inc
ár1ind
ár1ing
ár1int
á2r1i2o
á2r1ir
ár1isp
ár1i2ta
ár1izo
ár1ír
árká2s
árkász1
ár1kh
1árkok
ármas1s
árnás1
áro2koz
ár1oll
áro2mér
áro2m1os
á2r1or
áros3s
á2rostr
árö2
ár1öl
ár1ös
ár1öv
ár1öz
á2r1ő2
ár1p2
1árpa.
árs3s
ár1str
árt1akt
árt1áll
árt1árn
árt1áru
ár2teg
ár2tig
ár2t1okt
ár2t1ön
ár1tro
1á2ru.
á2rud
á2rué
1á2ruf
1á2rui
1áruj
á2ruke
1á2ruké
á2rum
1á2rup
á2rur
á2rut
ár1uta
1áruü
1áruv
ár1úr
árú2t
ár1úti
á2rü
1árvu
á1ry
á2s1abl
á2sad
ás1a2dó
á2s1a2j
á2s1akt
ás1a2la
ás1alk
ás1alm
ás1a2lo
ása2n
á2s1ana
á2s1any
á2s1as
á2s1a2u
á2s1a2v
á2s1a2z
á2sábr
á2s1ál
ás1áru
á2sást
ás1átl
ás1átv
ás1e2d
á2s1e2l
ás1em
á2s1en
á2s1e2s
ás1ex
ás1ez
á2s1é2l
á2s1ép
ás1ére
á2s1érte
á2s1érté
á2s1és
á2s1éve
á2s1id
á2s1if
ási2g
ás1iga
ás1inf
ás1int
á2s1i2p
ás1i2rá
á2s1is
á2s1ín
á2s1í2r
ás1ív
ás1k
ás1okta
á2s1or
ás1osz
1á2só.
1á2sój
1á2sók
1á2són
á2sór
ás1órá
1á2sót
á2s1ö
á2s1ő
ás1p2
áspis1
áss2
ás1st
á1ssy
ás3sze
ás3szé
ás3szi
ás3szor
ás3szö
ás3szt
ás3szü
ás1tra
á2s1uj
ásu2t
ás1uta
ás1utá
ás1u2z
á2s1üg
ás1ür
ás1üs
á2s1ü2v
á2sz1aj
á2sz1ap
á2szas
ás3zav
2ászá
á2szág
ász1eb
ász1el
ász1em
ász1ep
ász1es
ász1e2t
ászé2
á2sz1éj
á2sz1én
ász1év
ászi2
á2szid
á2sz1in
á2sz1ir
á2sz1is
ász1ors
ász1osz
ász1ös
